Hawaii statutes.
§264-86 Requirement as to screening.
The director of transportation may promulgate rules and regulations governing
the location, planting, construction, and maintenance, including the materials
used in the screening required by this part. [L 1966, c 46, pt of §2; HRS
§264-86]

Cross References

Rulemaking, see chapter 91.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next